District of Columbia statutes.
2-1711

Annual report.

(a)

The Office shall submit an annual report covering the preceding fiscal year to the Mayor by January 1st.

(b)

A copy of the annual report shall be sent to each member of the Council and placed in each branch of the public library.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 12, 32 DCR 3590
1981 Ed., § 1-2911.